Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 43-6-1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, “blind,” “totally blind,” “visually handicapped,” and “partially blind” mean having central visual acuity not to exceed 20/200 in the better eye, with corrected lenses as measured by the Snellen test, or having visual acuity greater than 20/200, but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle not greater than twenty (20) degrees.

As used in this article, “deaf person” means a person who cannot readily understand spoken language through hearing alone with or without a hearing aid, and who may also have a speech defect which renders his speech unintelligible to most people with normal hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-25; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978); brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-3.
Right to use public facilities.

Blind persons, visually handicapped persons, deaf persons and other physically disabled persons shall have the same right as the able-bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978); brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-5.
Right of access to public conveyances and accommodations.

Blind persons, visually handicapped persons, deaf persons and other physically disabled persons shall be entitled to full and equal access, as are other members of the general public, to accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motorbuses, streetcars, boats or any other public conveyances or modes of transportation, hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law, or state or federal regulation, and applicable alike to all persons.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-22; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978); brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-7.
Right to be accompanied by guide dog or hearing ear dog.

Every totally or partially blind person and every deaf person shall have the right to be accompanied by a guide dog or hearing ear dog on a blaze orange leash, especially trained for the purpose, in any of the places specified in Section 43-6-5 without being required to pay an extra charge for the guide dog or hearing ear dog on a blaze orange leash. However, such person shall be liable for any damage done to the premises or facilities by such dog.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-23; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978); brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-9.
Blind and deaf pedestrians.

A totally or partially blind pedestrian or deaf person shall have all the rights and privileges conferred by law upon other persons in any of the places, accommodations, or conveyances specified in Sections 43-6-3 and 43-6-5, notwithstanding the fact that such person is not carrying a predominantly white cane (with or without a red tip), or using a guide dog or hearing ear dog on a blaze orange leash. The failure of a totally or partially blind person or deaf person to carry such a cane or to use such a guide dog or hearing ear dog on a blaze orange leash shall not constitute negligence per se.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-24; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978); brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-6-11.
Penalties.

Any person or persons, firm or corporation who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the public facilities as specified in Sections 43-6-3 and 43-6-5, or otherwise interferes with the rights of a totally or partially blind person, deaf person or other disabled person under Sections 43-6-3 through 43-6-7, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-27; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978).

§ 43-6-13.
White Cane Safety Days.

Each year the governor shall publicly proclaim October 15 as White Cane Safety Day. He shall issue a proclamation in which:

Comments shall be made upon the significance of this article.

Citizens of the state are called upon to observe the provisions of this article and to take precautions necessary to the safety of disabled persons.

Citizens of the state are reminded of the policies with respect to disabled persons declared in this article and be urged to cooperate in giving effect to them.

Emphasis shall be made on the need of the citizenry to be aware of the presence of disabled persons in the community and to keep safe and functional for the disabled the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, other public places, places of public accommodation, amusement and resort, and other places to which the public is invited, and to offer assistance to disabled persons upon appropriate occasions.

It is the policy of this state to encourage and enable blind persons, visually handicapped persons, and other physically disabled persons to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7158-26; Laws, 1972, ch. 451, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1972).

§ 43-6-15.
Employment in government service.

No person shall be refused employment in state services, the service of political subdivisions of the state, in public schools, or any other employment supported in whole or in part by public funds, by reason of his being blind, visually handicapped, deaf, or otherwise physically handicapped, unless such disability shall materially affect the performance of the work required by the job for which such person applies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 381; Laws, 1978, ch. 402, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978).